Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 5. Restrictions on Issuance and Transfer of Licenses.

Sec. 04.11.390.
Residence requirements. [Repealed, § 19 ch 74 SLA 1999.]

Sec. 04.11.395.
Board imposed conditions or restrictions.

The board may, in the best interests of the public, impose conditions or restrictions on a license or permit issued under this chapter.

History.

(§ 18 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Sec. 04.11.395.
Conditions or restrictions imposed on a license, endorsement, or permit.

The board may, in the best interests of the public, impose conditions or restrictions on a license, endorsement, or permit issued under this chapter.

(b)

Except for a conditional contractor's permit issued under AS

04.09.690

, the board may delegate to the director the authority to impose, in the best interests of the public, conditions or restrictions on a permit issued under this chapter.

History.

(§ 18 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 47, 48 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.400.
Population limitations.

Except as provided in (d), (f), and (h) — (k) of this section and AS

04.11.405

, a new license may not be issued and the board may prohibit relocation of an existing license

outside an established village, incorporated city, unified municipality, or organized borough if, after the issuance or relocation, there would be (A) more than one restaurant or eating place license for each 1,500 population or fraction of that population, or (B) more than one license of each other type, including licenses that have been issued under (d) of this section, for each 3,000 population or fraction of that population, in a radius of five miles of the licensed premises, excluding the populations of established villages, incorporated cities, unified municipalities, and organized boroughs that are wholly or partly included within the radius;

inside an established village, incorporated city, or unified municipality if, after the issuance or relocation, there would be inside the established village, incorporated city, or unified municipality

more than one restaurant or eating place license for each 1,500 population or fraction of that population; or

more than one license of each other type, including licenses that have been issued under (d) of this section, for each 3,000 population or fraction of that population;

inside an organized borough but outside an established village or incorporated city located within the borough if, after the issuance or relocation, there would be inside the borough, but outside the established villages and incorporated cities located within the borough,

more than one restaurant or eating place license for each 1,500 population or fraction of that population; or

more than one license of each other type, including licenses that have been issued under (d) of this section, for each 3,000 population or fraction of that population excluding the population of those established villages that have adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491(b)(1)

, (3), or (4), and excluding the population of incorporated cities located within the organized borough.

If the radius described in (a)(1) of this section encompasses all of an established village, incorporated city, or unified municipality and the population resident inside and outside the established village, incorporated city, or unified municipality but inside the radius described in (a)(1) of the section is less than 3,000, the board may deny the issuance or relocation of the license.

[Repealed, § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985.]

The board may approve

the issuance of a new beverage dispensary or restaurant or eating place license without regard to (a) of this section if it appears that the issuance will encourage the tourist trade by encouraging the construction or improvement of

a hotel, motel, resort, or similar business relating to the tourist trade with a dining facility or having kitchen facilities in a majority of its rental rooms and at least a minimum number of rental rooms required according to the population of the incorporated city, unified municipality, or population area established under (a) of this section in which the facility will be located, as follows:

10 rental rooms if the population is less than 1,501;

20 rental rooms if the population is 1,501 — 2,500;

25 rental rooms if the population is 2,501 — 5,000;

30 rental rooms if the population is 5,001 — 15,000;

35 rental rooms if the population is 15,001 — 25,000;

40 rental rooms if the population is 25,001 — 50,000; and

50 rental rooms if the population is greater than 50,000; or

an airport terminal; and

the renewal or transfer of ownership of a beverage dispensary or restaurant or eating place license issued under (1) of this subsection if the

holder of the license operates a hotel, motel, resort, or similar business relating to the tourist trade that

has a dining facility on the licensed premises or kitchen facilities in a majority of its rental rooms; and

maintains at least the minimum number of rental rooms that the hotel, motel, resort, or similar business had at the time of initial licensure or that was required at the time of initial licensure; or

licensed premises are located inside an airport terminal.

[Repealed, § 165 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

An application requesting a transfer of location of licensed premises limited under (a) or (b) of this section shall be granted without regard to (a) of this section if the new location is less than one mile from the original location and

no ground for denial exists under AS

04.11.340

(1) or (3); and

relocation of the licensed premises is necessary due to

termination of a lease or rental agreement;

condemnation of the premises;

the substantial destruction of the premises by any cause.

[Repealed, § 165 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Except as provided in (f) of this section, within an incorporated city, unified municipality or an organized borough, a new club license may be issued, and the relocation of an existing club license may be approved by the board if

the issuance or relocation of club licenses under the population limitation contained in (2) of this subsection has been approved by resolution adopted by the incorporated city, unified municipality, or organized borough within which the club license is to be issued or relocated; and

after issuance or relocation there would not be, inside the incorporated city or unified municipality, or inside the organized borough but outside the incorporated cities located within the borough, more than one club license for each 1,500 population or fraction of 1,500 population.

This section does not apply to a golf course license issued under AS

04.11.115

.

The board may approve the issuance of an outdoor recreation lodge license without regard to (a) of this section if it appears that the issuance will encourage the tourist trade by encouraging the construction or improvement of a business relating to the tourist trade and the business meets the requirements for issuance of the license under AS

04.11.225

.

The board may allow the relocation of an existing beverage dispensary license under AS

04.11.090

to a restaurant, eating place, or hotel, motel, resort, or similar business that contains a restaurant or eating place, in a borough with a population of 60,000 or more if the governing body of the borough approves the relocation. However, if the relocation of the license is into or within an incorporated city in the borough, the board may not approve the relocation unless the governing bodies of both the borough and the incorporated city approve the relocation. The board may allow not more than three relocations in a borough under this subsection each decade. In this subsection, “decade” means each 10-year period beginning April 1 in a year ending in zero.

In (a)(1) of this section, “population” includes only those persons residing inside the radius not later than the date the application is received by the board and not earlier than 60 days before the application is received by the board.

In (a)(2) and (3) of this section, “population” includes only those persons residing inside the established village, incorporated city, unified municipality, or organized borough as of December 31 of the year preceding the date of application.

In this section “radius” means the circular area or distance limited by the sweep of a straight line originating at the proposed licensed premises and extending outward.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 9 — 16 ch 93 SLA 1985; am §§ 3, 4 ch 17 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1995; am § 19 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 3, 4 ch 125 SLA 1998; am §§ 8, 9 ch 41 SLA 2005; am §§ 6, 7 ch 25 SLA 2007; am § 7 ch 59 SLA 2018; am §§ 49, 165 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (d) — (h) were formerly (g) — (k), respectively, relettered in 1994, at which time internal subsection references were also changed.

Subsections (

l

) and (m) were enacted as (e) and (f), relettered as (i) and (j) in 1994, and relettered as (

l

) and (m) in 2012.

Subsection (n) was enacted as (d), relettered as (k) in 1994, relettered as (m) in 2005, and relettered in 2007 as (n).

Subsection (i) was enacted as (

l

), relettered in 1998 as (k), and relettered in 2012 as (i), with conforming changes to the cross-reference in subsection (a).

Subsection (j) was enacted as (m), relettered in 2005 as (

l

), and relettered in 2012 as (j), with conforming changes to the cross-reference in subsection (a).

Subsection (k) was enacted as (n), relettered in 2007 as (m), and relettered in 2012 as (k), with conforming changes to the cross-reference in subsection (a).

Cross references. —

For a transitional provision prescribing the duration of the first decade of the limitation on relocation of licenses under the definition of “decade” set out in (m) of this section, enacted as (n) and relettered, see § 19, ch. 25, SLA 2007, in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

For licenses, see 13 AAC 104, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, in the introductory language of (d)(1), substituted “the issuance of a new beverage dispensary” for “the issuance or transfer of ownership of a beverage dispensary” and deleted “or transfer” following “appears that the issuance”, in (d)(1)(A), deleted “established village,” following “according to the population of the”, added (d)(2), made stylistic and related changes throughout the subsection.

Sec. 04.11.400.
Population limitations.

Except as provided in (f), (i), and (k) of this section and AS

04.11.405

, a new license may not be issued and the board may prohibit relocation of an existing license

outside an established village, incorporated city, unified municipality, or organized borough if, after the issuance or relocation, in a radius of five miles of the licensed premises, excluding the populations of established villages, incorporated cities, unified municipalities, and organized boroughs that are wholly or partly included within the radius, there would be

more than one restaurant or eating place license for each 1,500 population or fraction of that population;

more than one brewery retail, one winery retail, and one distillery retail license for each 9,000 population or fraction of that population; or

more than one license of each other type, except a type listed in (i) of this section, for each 3,000 population or fraction of that population;

inside an established village, incorporated city, or unified municipality if, after the issuance or relocation, there would be inside the established village, incorporated city, or unified municipality

more than one restaurant or eating place license for each 1,500 population or fraction of that population;

more than one brewery retail, one winery retail, and one distillery retail license for each 9,000 population or fraction of that population; or

more than one license of each other type, except a type listed in (i) of this section, for each 3,000 population or fraction of that population;

inside an organized borough but outside an established village or incorporated city located within the borough if, after the issuance or relocation, there would be inside the borough, but outside the established villages and incorporated cities located within the borough, excluding the population of those established villages that have adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491(b)(1)

or (3), and excluding the population of incorporated cities located within the organized borough,

more than one restaurant or eating place license for each 1,500 population or fraction of that population;

more than one brewery retail, one winery retail, and one distillery retail license for each 9,000 population or fraction of that population; or

more than one license of each other type, except a type listed in (i) of this section, for each 3,000 population or fraction of that population.

If the radius described in (a)(1) of this section encompasses all of an established village, incorporated city, or unified municipality and the population resident inside and outside the established village, incorporated city, or unified municipality but inside the radius described in (a)(1) of the section is less than 3,000, the board may deny the issuance or relocation of the license.

[Repealed, § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985.]

[Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

[Repealed, § 165 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

An application requesting a transfer of location of licensed premises limited under (a) or (b) of this section shall be granted without regard to (a) of this section if the new location is less than one mile from the original location and

no ground for denial exists under AS

04.11.340

(1) or (3); and

relocation of the licensed premises is necessary due to

termination of a lease or rental agreement;

condemnation of the premises;

the substantial destruction of the premises by any cause.

[Repealed, § 165 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

[Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

This section does not apply to a

brewery manufacturer license issued under AS

04.09.020

;

winery manufacturer license issued under AS

04.09.030

;

distillery manufacturer license issued under AS

04.09.040

;

general wholesale license issued under AS

04.09.100

;

limited wholesale brewed beverage and wine license issued under AS

04.09.110

;

outdoor recreation lodge license issued under AS

04.09.280

;

destination resort license issued under AS

04.09.310

;

beverage dispensary tourism license issued under AS

04.09.350

;

seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license issued under AS

04.09.360

;

manufacturer direct shipment license issued under AS

04.09.370

;

conditional contractor’s permit issued under AS

04.09.690

.

[Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

The board may allow the relocation of an existing beverage dispensary license under AS

04.09.200

or former AS

04.11.090

to a restaurant, eating place, or hotel, motel, resort, or similar business that contains a restaurant or eating place, an existing package store license under AS

04.09.230

or former AS

04.11.150

, an existing brewery retail license under AS

04.09.320

, an existing winery retail license under AS

04.09.330

, or an existing distillery retail license under AS

04.09.340

in a borough with a population of 50,000 or more into or within an incorporated city in the borough. The board may not approve the relocation unless, at the time of application, the existing number of issued licenses of the type under consideration for relocation located within the borough exceeds the maximum allowed under (a) of this section and the governing bodies of both the borough and the incorporated city approve the relocation. The board may allow not more than three relocations into each city under this subsection each decade. In this subsection, “decade” means each 10-year period beginning April 1 in a year ending in zero.

In (a)(1) of this section, “population” includes only those persons residing inside the radius not later than the date the application is received by the board and not earlier than 60 days before the application is received by the board.

In (a)(2) and (3) of this section, “population” includes only those persons residing inside the established village, incorporated city, unified municipality, or organized borough as of December 31 of the year preceding the date of application.

In this section “radius” means the circular area or distance limited by the sweep of a straight line originating at the proposed licensed premises and extending outward.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 9 — 16 ch 93 SLA 1985; am §§ 3, 4 ch 17 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1995; am § 19 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 3, 4 ch 125 SLA 1998; am §§ 8, 9 ch 41 SLA 2005; am §§ 6, 7 ch 25 SLA 2007; am § 7 ch 59 SLA 2018; am §§ 49, 165 ch 8 SLA 2022; am §§ 50, 52, 53, 164 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.400.
Population limitations.

Except as provided in (f), (i), and (k) of this section and AS

04.11.405

, a new license may not be issued and the board may prohibit relocation of an existing license

outside an established village, incorporated city, unified municipality, or organized borough if, after the issuance or relocation, in a radius of five miles of the licensed premises, excluding the populations of established villages, incorporated cities, unified municipalities, and organized boroughs that are wholly or partly included within the radius, there would be

more than one restaurant or eating place license for each 1,500 population or fraction of that population;

more than one brewery retail, one winery retail, and one distillery retail license for each 9,000 population or fraction of that population; or

more than one license of each other type, except a type listed in (i) of this section, for each 3,000 population or fraction of that population;

inside an established village, incorporated city, or unified municipality if, after the issuance or relocation, there would be inside the established village, incorporated city, or unified municipality

more than one restaurant or eating place license for each 1,500 population or fraction of that population;

more than one brewery retail, one winery retail, and one distillery retail license for each 9,000 population or fraction of that population; or

more than one license of each other type, except a type listed in (i) of this section, for each 3,000 population or fraction of that population;

inside an organized borough but outside an established village or incorporated city located within the borough if, after the issuance or relocation, there would be inside the borough, but outside the established villages and incorporated cities located within the borough, excluding the population of those established villages that have adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491(b)(1)

or (3), and excluding the population of incorporated cities located within the organized borough,

more than one restaurant or eating place license for each 1,500 population or fraction of that population;

more than one brewery retail, one winery retail, and one distillery retail license for each 9,000 population or fraction of that population; or

more than one license of each other type, except a type listed in (i) of this section, for each 3,000 population or fraction of that population.

If the radius described in (a)(1) of this section encompasses all of an established village, incorporated city, or unified municipality and the population resident inside and outside the established village, incorporated city, or unified municipality but inside the radius described in (a)(1) of the section is less than 3,000, the board may deny the issuance or relocation of the license.

[Repealed, § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985.]

[Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

[Repealed, § 165 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

An application requesting a transfer of location of licensed premises limited under (a) or (b) of this section shall be granted without regard to (a) of this section if the new location is less than one mile from the original location and

no ground for denial exists under AS

04.11.340

(1) or (3); and

relocation of the licensed premises is necessary due to

termination of a lease or rental agreement;

condemnation of the premises;

the substantial destruction of the premises by any cause.

[Repealed, § 165 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

[Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

This section does not apply to a

brewery manufacturer license issued under AS

04.09.020

;

winery manufacturer license issued under AS

04.09.030

;

distillery manufacturer license issued under AS

04.09.040

;

general wholesale license issued under AS

04.09.100

;

limited wholesale brewed beverage and wine license issued under AS

04.09.110

;

outdoor recreation lodge license issued under AS

04.09.280

;

destination resort license issued under AS

04.09.310

;

beverage dispensary tourism license issued under AS

04.09.350

;

seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license issued under AS

04.09.360

;

manufacturer direct shipment license issued under AS

04.09.370

;

conditional contractor’s permit issued under AS

04.09.690

.

[Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

The board may allow the relocation of an existing beverage dispensary license under AS

04.09.200

or former AS

04.11.090

to a restaurant, eating place, or hotel, motel, resort, or similar business that contains a restaurant or eating place, an existing package store license under AS

04.09.230

or former AS

04.11.150

, an existing brewery retail license under AS

04.09.320

, an existing winery retail license under AS

04.09.330

, or an existing distillery retail license under AS

04.09.340

in a borough with a population of 50,000 or more into or within an incorporated city in the borough. The board may not approve the relocation unless, at the time of application, the existing number of issued licenses of the type under consideration for relocation located within the borough exceeds the maximum allowed under (a) of this section and the governing bodies of both the borough and the incorporated city approve the relocation. The board may allow not more than three relocations into each city under this subsection each decade. In this subsection, “decade” means each 10-year period beginning April 1 in a year ending in zero.

In (a)(1) of this section, “population” includes only those persons residing inside the radius not later than the date the application is received by the board and not earlier than 60 days before the application is received by the board.

In (a)(2) and (3) of this section, “population” includes only those persons residing inside the established village, incorporated city, unified municipality, or organized borough as of December 31 of the year preceding the date of application.

In this section “radius” means the circular area or distance limited by the sweep of a straight line originating at the proposed licensed premises and extending outward.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 9 — 16 ch 93 SLA 1985; am §§ 3, 4 ch 17 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1995; am § 19 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 3, 4 ch 125 SLA 1998; am §§ 8, 9 ch 41 SLA 2005; am §§ 6, 7 ch 25 SLA 2007; am § 7 ch 59 SLA 2018; am §§ 49, 165 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 51 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.405.
Petition for additional restaurant or eating place licenses for certain local governing bodies.

A first class city, a home rule city, or a unified municipality may submit a resolution to the board, adopted by its legislative body, petitioning the board for the issuance of additional restaurant or eating place licenses under AS

04.11.100

that exceed the limits under AS

04.11.400(a)

in accordance with this section.

The board, following a public hearing, may issue one or more additional restaurant or eating place licenses under AS

04.11.100

, within the boundaries of the municipality, if the board finds that

the municipality

serves as a center for commercial activity within and outside the boundaries of the municipality by providing goods and services to a population that is greater than the permanent resident population within the boundaries of the municipality;

maintains a local law enforcement department;

exercises planning or land use authority; and

at the time of the petition, meets or exceeds the maximum limit under AS

04.11.400(a)

for restaurant or eating place licenses issued under AS

04.11.100

;

the number of additional licenses does not exceed the number of additional licenses requested by the municipality in the petition; and

granting the additional licenses is in the public interest.

A resolution submitted by a municipality under (a) of this section must include

information demonstrating that the petitioner meets the criteria in (b) of this section;

the most recent estimate of the number of people who claim residency or work outside the boundaries of the municipality and who are served by the municipality, including the

population located outside the boundaries of the municipality that relies on the municipality for goods and services;

visitor population; and

nonresident worker population that resides in the municipality, but that is not counted in the latest federal or state census for the municipality;

the number of existing restaurant or eating place licenses

within the boundaries of the municipality;

in a geographic area that the municipality serves under (2) of this subsection;

information showing that the number of additional licenses requested does not exceed one license for each 1,500 population of the population identified under (2) of this subsection; and

additional justification, as necessary, to demonstrate that granting of the additional licenses is in the public interest.

If the board grants a petition for additional restaurant or eating place licenses under this section to a municipality, the board may not authorize additional restaurant or eating place licenses to the same municipality under this section for the following year.

History.

(§ 54 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.405.
Petition for additional restaurant or eating place licenses for certain local governing bodies.

A first class city, a home rule city, or a unified municipality may submit a resolution to the board, adopted by its legislative body, petitioning the board for the issuance of additional restaurant or eating place licenses under AS

04.09.210

that exceed the limits under AS

04.11.400(a)

in accordance with this section.

The board, following a public hearing, may issue one or more additional restaurant or eating place licenses under AS

04.09.210

, within the boundaries of the municipality, if the board finds that

the municipality

serves as a center for commercial activity within and outside the boundaries of the municipality by providing goods and services to a population that is greater than the permanent resident population within the boundaries of the municipality;

maintains a local law enforcement department;

exercises planning or land use authority; and

at the time of the petition, meets or exceeds the maximum limit under AS

04.11.400(a)

for restaurant or eating place licenses issued under AS

04.09.210

;

the number of additional licenses does not exceed the number of additional licenses requested by the municipality in the petition; and

granting the additional licenses is in the public interest.

A resolution submitted by a municipality under (a) of this section must include

information demonstrating that the petitioner meets the criteria in (b) of this section;

the most recent estimate of the number of people who claim residency or work outside the boundaries of the municipality and who are served by the municipality, including the

population located outside the boundaries of the municipality that relies on the municipality for goods and services;

visitor population; and

nonresident worker population that resides in the municipality, but that is not counted in the latest federal or state census for the municipality;

the number of existing restaurant or eating place licenses

within the boundaries of the municipality;

in a geographic area that the municipality serves under (2) of this subsection;

information showing that the number of additional licenses requested does not exceed one license for each 1,500 population of the population identified under (2) of this subsection; and

additional justification, as necessary, to demonstrate that granting of the additional licenses is in the public interest.

If the board grants a petition for additional restaurant or eating place licenses under this section to a municipality, the board may not authorize additional restaurant or eating place licenses to the same municipality under this section for the following year.

History.

(§ 54 ch 8 SLA 2022; am §§ 55, 56 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.410.
Restriction of location near churches and schools.

A beverage dispensary or package store license may not be issued and the location of an existing license may not be transferred if the licensed premises would be located in a building the public entrance of which is within 200 feet of a school ground or a church building in which religious services are regularly conducted, measured by the shortest pedestrian route from the outer boundaries of the school ground or the public entrance of the church building. However, a license issued before the presence of either cause of restriction within 200 feet of the licensed premises may be renewed or transferred to a person notwithstanding this subsection.

If a beverage dispensary or package store license for premises located within 200 feet of a school ground or church building in which religious services are regularly conducted is revoked, expires, or is transferred to another location, a beverage dispensary or package store license may not be issued or transferred to the formerly licensed premises until the cessation of either cause of restriction.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Borough ordinance requiring a protest where the location of the premises would be within 500 feet of an already established school, playground, or church was not inconsistent with subsection (a) because the ordinance did not restrict a right created by state law, state law did not prohibit local regulation of the subject, and the local ordinance was stricter than state law. August 18, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 04.11.420.
Zoning limitations.

A person may not be issued a license or permit in a municipality if a zoning regulation or ordinance prohibits the sale or consumption of alcoholic beverages unless a variance of the regulation or ordinance has been approved.

The municipality shall inform the board of zoning regulations or ordinances that prohibit the sale or consumption of alcoholic beverages.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.11.420.
Zoning limitations.

A person may not be issued a new license, endorsement, or permit or transfer a license or a license with endorsement to a new location in a municipality if a zoning regulation or ordinance prohibits the land use unless a variance of the regulation or ordinance has been approved.

The municipality shall inform the board of zoning regulations or ordinances that prohibit the sale or consumption of alcoholic beverages.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a license may be renewed if

the license was issued before the effective date of a change to a local zoning regulation or ordinance that would prohibit the renewal; and

at the time the license was issued, the license conformed with local zoning regulations and ordinances.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 57, 58 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.430.
Person and location.

Each license shall be issued to a specific individual or individuals, to a partnership, including a limited partnership, to a limited liability organization, to a corporation, to a government entity, or to a tribal organization. If the license is issued to a corporation or a limited liability organization, the registered agent of the corporation or limited liability organization may be either an individual resident of the state or a domestic corporation authorized to transact business in this state whose business office is the same as the registered office.

Except for a license authorizing the sale of alcoholic beverages on a common carrier, a specific location shall be indicated on the license, endorsement, or permit as the licensed premises, the principal address of which shall be indicated on the license, endorsement, or permit. The mailing address, telephone number, and electronic mailing address of a licensee or, if the licensee is a corporation, the address, telephone number, and electronic mailing address of the registered office of the corporation must be kept current and on file in the main office of the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 17 ch 93 SLA 1985; am § 12 ch 74 SLA 1999; am § 59 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Collateral references. —

Transfer of retail liquor license or permit from one location to another. 98 ALR2d 1123.

Sec. 04.11.450.
Prohibited financial interest.

A person other than a licensee may not have a direct or indirect financial interest in the business for which a license is issued.

A person who is a representative or owner of a wholesale business, brewery, winery, bottling works, or distillery may not be issued, solely or together with others, a beverage dispensary license, a restaurant or eating place license, or package store license. A holder of a beverage dispensary license may be issued a brewpub license, subject to the provisions of AS

04.11.135

. The prohibition against issuance of a restaurant or eating place license imposed under this subsection does not apply to a restaurant or eating place license issued on or before October 1, 1996 or a restaurant or eating place license issued under an application for a restaurant or eating place license approved on or before October 1, 1996.

A license may not be leased by a licensee to another person, partnership, limited liability organization, or corporation.

For the purposes of this section, a lessor under a graduated or percentage lease-rent agreement involving premises licensed under this title does not hold a financial interest in the business.

A holder of either a general wholesale license or a wholesale malt beverage and wine license may not be employed by or act as the agent or employee of the holder of a beverage dispensary or package store license.

In this section, “direct or indirect financial interest” means holding a legal or equitable interest in the operation of a business licensed under this title. However, credit extended by a distiller, a brewery, or a winery to a wholesaler, or credit extended by a wholesaler to persons licensed under this title, or a consulting fee received from a person licensed under this title, is not considered a financial interest in a business licensed under this title.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 5, 6 ch 111 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 136 SLA 1996; am § 13 ch 74 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (f) was formerly (c) and subsections (c)-(e) were formerly (d)-(f). Relettered in 1994.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Sec. 04.11.450.
Prohibited financial interest.

A person other than a licensee may not have a direct or indirect financial interest in the business for which a license is issued.

A person who is a representative or owner of a wholesale business licensed under AS

04.09.100

or

04.09.110

may not be issued, solely or together with others, a manufacturer license issued under AS

04.09.020

—

04.09.040

, or a retail license issued under AS

04.09.200

—

04.09.370

.

A license may not be leased by a licensee to another person, partnership, limited liability organization, or corporation.

For the purposes of this section, a lessor under a graduated or percentage lease-rent agreement involving premises licensed under this title does not hold a financial interest in the business.

A holder of either a general wholesale license or a limited wholesale brewed beverage and wine license may not be employed by or act as the agent or employee of the holder of a manufacturer license under AS

04.09.020

—

04.09.040

or a retail license under AS

04.09.200

—

04.09.370

.

In this section, “direct or indirect financial interest” means holding a legal or equitable interest in the operation of a business licensed under this title. However, credit extended by a distiller, a brewery, or a winery to a wholesaler, or credit extended by a wholesaler to persons licensed under this title, or a consulting fee received from a person licensed under this title, is not considered a financial interest in a business licensed under this title.

The holder of a manufacturer license that annually produces in total 300,000 barrels or more of brewed beverages or mead or cider containing less than 8.5 percent alcohol by volume, 50,000 nine-liter-equivalent cases or more of wine, sake, or mead or cider containing 8.5 percent or more alcohol by volume, or 50,000 nine- liter-equivalent cases or more of distilled spirits may not be issued, solely or together with others, a license under AS

04.09.100

—

04.09.370

.

For purposes of calculating the volume that the holder of a manufacturer license produces under this section, the volume of production must include all production by

the holder of the manufacturer’s license; and

an officer, director, agent, employee, or affiliate of the holder; in this paragraph, “affiliate” means a person that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, a corporation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 5, 6 ch 111 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 136 SLA 1996; am § 13 ch 74 SLA 1999; am §§ 60 – 52 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.460.
Prior public approval.

A new license or the transfer of location of an existing license may not be approved by the board in an area outside but within 50 miles of the boundaries of a municipality unless a petition asking that the license be issued or transferred within the area containing signatures of a majority of the permanent residents residing within one mile of the proposed premises is filed with the board.

A license may not be issued in an area that is 50 miles or more from the boundaries of a municipality unless a petition asking that the license be issued within the area containing the signatures of two-thirds of the permanent residents residing within a radius of five miles of the United States post office station nearest to the proposed licensed premises, is filed with the board. If there are two or more United States post office stations in the vicinity of the proposed licensed premises, the nearest to the premises constitutes the point of beginning under this subsection. If there is no United States post office station within a radius of five miles of the proposed licensed premises, the applicant must obtain the signatures of two-thirds of the permanent residents residing within a five mile radius of the proposed licensed premises. A petition is not required for the renewal of a license issued in accordance with this subsection unless specifically required by the board.

In this section, “permanent resident” means a person 21 years of age or older who has established a permanent place of abode.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 109 SLA 1983)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1980, (b) of this section was rearranged for clarity.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

45 Am. Jur. 2d, Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 123, 124.